Mississippi, session 2026, HB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, hereinafter DPS, shall sell and convey the facility currently used by and for the benefit of the Highway Safety Patrol as its Troop H headquarters and Driver Service Bureau facility, and any improvements thereon, located in Lauderdale County, Mississippi, to COMPASS DATACENTERS JAN I LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, with the property being more particularly described as follows:  Property located at 910 Highway 11 and 80, Meridian, Lauderdale County, Mississippi; Parcel-# 081020000000000402/PPIN# 49049 consisting of approximately 8.85 acres and all structures and improvements. (2)  The real property and improvements described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be purchased for an amount less than the current fair market value as determined by the average of two (2) appraisals by qualified appraisers, at least one (1) of whom shall be selected by the Department of Public Safety, and both of whom shall be certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. (3)  Compass shall pay any and all closing costs related to the acquisition of this property. (4)  The Department of Public Safety may correct any discrepancies in the legal descriptions of the property or purchasing entity provided in these sections. (5)  The newly reconstructed facility shall be known as the "Charles Young, Sr., facility." SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.